District of Columbia statutes.
9-1109.06

Procurement law inapplicable.

Chapter 3 of Title 2 shall not apply to contracts of the joint state oversight agency.

History

Sept. 23, 1997, D.C. Law 12-20, § 7, 44 DCR 4023

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2445.6.